Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Motor Vehicles Generally

§ 1241.
Locking device.

A motor vehicle shall be provided with a lock, key, or other device to prevent such motor vehicle from being set in motion by its own motive power.

§ 1242.
Safety glass.

A person shall not operate on a highway in this State a motor vehicle registered in Vermont, manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1936, unless such vehicle is equipped with safety glass, wherever glass is used in doors, windows, and windshields. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall suspend the registration of any motor vehicle found to be operating in violation of this section until the provisions hereof are satisfactorily complied with.

This section does not apply to trailer coaches.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 31

, § 1.

§ 1243.
Lights.

A motor vehicle, except a motorcycle and motor-driven cycle, in use or at rest on a highway, unless otherwise provided, during the period from 30 minutes after sunset to 30 minutes before sunrise, shall also be equipped with at least two lighted head lamps of substantially the same intensity and with reflectors and lenses of a design approved by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and with a lighted tail or rear lamp of a design so approved. A motorcycle or motor-driven cycle may be operated during the period mentioned if equipped with at least one lighted head lamp and at least one lighted tail or rear lamp, both of a design approved by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. A sidecar attached to such motorcycle or motor-driven cycle shall be equipped with a light on the right side of such sidecar visible from the front thereof. A person shall not operate a motor vehicle during the period mentioned unless it is equipped as defined in this section.

Every vehicle upon a highway within this State, at any time from 30 minutes after sunset to 30 minutes before sunrise and at any other time when, due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric conditions, persons or vehicles on the highway are not clearly discernible at a distance of 500 feet ahead, shall display lighted lamps and illuminating devices as respectively required for different classes of vehicles, subject to exceptions with respect to parked vehicles.

Local regulations made and promulgated by the legislative bodies of municipalities govern within their respective municipalities with relation to the use of lights at night on motor vehicles at rest or in motion on well-lighted streets. Stop lights, turn signals, and other signaling devices shall be lighted as prescribed for their use.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. March 1, 1973;

1977, No. 20

, § 7;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 19j, eff. Sept. 1, 2010.

§ 1244.
Illumination required.

The light from the front lamps of a motor vehicle other than a motorcycle, while such vehicle is in motion, shall render any substantial object on the ground clearly visible at least 150 feet ahead of such vehicle and, while such vehicle is at rest, shall be visible for at least 200 feet in the direction in which such vehicle is headed.

§ 1245.
Illumination required on motorcycles.

The light from the front lamp of a motorcycle shall render any substantial object on the ground clearly visible at least 100 feet ahead of such motorcycle.

§ 1246.
Restrictions.

A person shall not use on a vehicle of any kind operated on the highway during the period stated in section 1243 of this title any lighting device of over four candle power equipped with a reflector, unless such device and the lens used therein and such candle power is approved by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, nor unless the same shall be so designed, deflected, or arranged that a beam of reflected light therefrom, when measured 75 feet or more ahead of the lamps shall not rise more than six inches above the height of the bulb in such lamp and in no event more than 42 inches from the level surface on which the vehicle stands under all conditions of load.
When vehicles are approaching each other from opposite directions, spotlights shall not be used except when projecting their rays directly on the ground and at a distance not exceeding 30 feet in front of the vehicle.

§ 1247.
Approval of lighting devices.

The manufacturer or distributor of each device or lens designed to control lights on motor vehicles shall apply to the Commissioner for his or her approval of the use of such device or lens in this State.
The Commissioner shall make or cause to be made such laboratory and road tests of each device or lens submitted as he or she deems necessary, or he or she may adopt the approval or disapproval of such device or lens by the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.).

§ 1248.
Taillights.

Every motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer, and pole trailer, and any other vehicle that is being drawn at the end of a combination of vehicles, shall be equipped with at least two taillamps mounted on the rear, except that one taillamp shall be allowed on any vehicle equipped with only one when it was manufactured.

Either a taillamp or a separate lamp shall be so constructed and placed as to illuminate with a white light all parts of the rear registration number plate on the vehicle so that all the numerals, letters, and marks on the plate are clearly visible and legible for at least 50 feet from the rear of the vehicle.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 75

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 1249.
Directional signal lamps.

A person shall not operate on a highway in this State a pleasure car, pleasure car with trailer coach attached, motor truck, truck-tractor in combination with a trailer or semi-trailer, motor bus, or school bus registered in Vermont, manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1955, unless such vehicle is equipped with directional signal lamps, of a type approved by the Commissioner, on front and rear of such vehicle or combination.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 32.

§ 1250.
Clearance lamps.

Every motor vehicle, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, having a width at any part in excess of 80 inches, when in use or at rest on a highway, during the period from 30 minutes after sunset to 30 minutes before sunrise, shall display on the left side of the vehicle at least one lamp, to be known as a clearance lamp, displaying an amber light visible under normal atmospheric conditions 500 feet ahead of the vehicle and displaying a red light visible, under like conditions, 500 feet to the rear of the vehicle, to mark as closely as possible the extreme height and width of the vehicle.

All motor vehicles of the pleasure car type having a width at any part in excess of 82 inches shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1991, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 1251.
Sirens and colored signal lamps; out-of-state emergency and rescue vehicles.

A motor vehicle shall not be operated upon a highway of this State equipped with a siren or signal lamp colored other than amber unless a permit authorizing this equipment, issued by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, is carried in the vehicle. A permit may be transferred following the same procedure and subject to the same time limits as set forth in section 321 of this title. The Commissioner may adopt additional rules as may be required to govern the acquisition of permits and the use pertaining to sirens and colored signal lamps.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, when responding to emergencies, law enforcement vehicles, ambulances, fire vehicles, or vehicles owned or leased by, or provided to, volunteer firefighters or rescue squad members that are registered or licensed by another state or province may use sirens and signal lamps in Vermont, and a permit shall not be required for such use, as long as the vehicle is properly permitted in its home state or province.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 265

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1985, No. 85

, § 6;

2001, No. 106

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 39;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. June 1, 2010.

§ 1252.
Issuance of permits for sirens or colored lamps, or both; use of amber lamps.

When satisfied as to the condition and use of the vehicle, the Commissioner shall issue and may revoke, for cause, permits for sirens and colored signal lamps in the following manner:

Sirens, blue signal lamps, or blue and white signal lamps, or a combination thereof, may be authorized for all law enforcement vehicles owned or leased by a law enforcement agency, a certified law enforcement officer, or the Vermont Criminal Justice Council.
(1) (A) Sirens, blue signal lamps, or blue and white signal lamps, or a combination thereof, may be authorized for all law enforcement vehicles owned or leased by a law enforcement agency, a certified law enforcement officer, or the Vermont Criminal Justice Council.

A red signal lamp or an amber signal lamp, or a combination thereof, may be authorized for all law enforcement vehicles owned or leased by a law enforcement agency, a certified law enforcement officer, or the Vermont Criminal Justice Council, provided that the Commissioner shall require the lamp or lamps be mounted so as to be visible primarily from the rear of the vehicle.

If the applicant is a constable, the application shall be accompanied by a certification by the town clerk that the applicant is the duly elected or appointed constable and attesting that the town has not voted to limit the constable’s authority to engage in enforcement activities under

24 V.S.A. § 1936a

.

Sirens and red or red and white signal lamps may be authorized for all ambulances and other emergency medical service (EMS) vehicles, vehicles owned or leased by a fire department, vehicles used solely in rescue operations, or vehicles owned or leased by, or provided to, volunteer firefighters and voluntary rescue squad members, including a vehicle owned by a volunteer’s employer when the volunteer has the written authorization of the employer to use the vehicle for emergency fire or rescue activities.
(2) (A) Sirens and red or red and white signal lamps may be authorized for all ambulances and other emergency medical service (EMS) vehicles, vehicles owned or leased by a fire department, vehicles used solely in rescue operations, or vehicles owned or leased by, or provided to, volunteer firefighters and voluntary rescue squad members, including a vehicle owned by a volunteer’s employer when the volunteer has the written authorization of the employer to use the vehicle for emergency fire or rescue activities.

A blue signal lamp or an amber signal lamp, or a combination thereof, may be authorized for all EMS vehicles or vehicles owned or leased by a fire department, provided that the Commissioner shall require the lamp or lamps be mounted so as to be visible primarily from the rear of the vehicle.

[Repealed.]

No motor vehicle, other than one owned by the applicant, shall be issued a permit until the Commissioner has recorded the information regarding both the owner of the vehicle and the applicant for the permit.

Upon application to the Commissioner, the Commissioner may issue a single permit for all the vehicles owned or leased by the applicant.

Sirens and red or red and white signal lamps or sirens and blue or blue and white signal lamps may be authorized for restored emergency or enforcement vehicles used for exhibition purposes. Sirens and lamps authorized under this subdivision may only be activated during an exhibition, such as a car show or parade.

Amber signal lamps shall be used on road maintenance vehicles, service vehicles, and wreckers and shall be used on all registered snow removal equipment when in use removing snow on public highways, and the amber lamps shall be mounted so as to be visible from all sides of the motor vehicle.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 265

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1969, No. 259

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

1985, No. 85

, § 7;

1987, No. 5

, § 1;

1987, No. 241

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1991, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 1 eff. April 10, 1992;

1995, No. 88

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2001, No. 106

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 57

, § 21;

2021, No. 76

, § 34.

§ 1253.
Inspection of permits.

Permits issued by the Commissioner in accordance with the provisions of sections 1251 and 1252 of this title shall be carried in some easily accessible place in the vehicles authorized to use the equipment and shall be available for inspection at any or all times by any law enforcement officer, or during the inspection by the authorized personnel of an official inspection station designated as such by the Department of Motor Vehicles, as provided by section 1222 of this title. No inspection sticker may be issued for a vehicle equipped with a siren or colored signal lamp, or both, unless a current or valid permit for the siren or colored signal lamp, or both, is produced for inspection. If a vehicle’s permit is issued pursuant to subdivision 1252(a)(5) of this title, a copy of the permit is acceptable.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 265

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2001, No. 106

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 1254.
Repealed.
1971, No. 228 (Adj. Sess.), § 32.

§ 1255.
Exceptions.

The provisions of section 1251 of this title shall not apply to directional signal lamps of a type approved by the Commissioner.

All persons with motor vehicles equipped as provided in subdivisions 1252(a)(1) and (2) of this title shall use the sirens or colored signal lamps, or both, only in the direct performance of their official duties. When any person other than a law enforcement officer is operating a motor vehicle equipped as provided in subdivision 1252(a)(1) of this title, the colored signal lamps shall be either removed, covered, or hooded. When any person other than an authorized emergency medical service vehicle operator, firefighter, or authorized operator of vehicles used in rescue operations is operating a motor vehicle equipped as provided in subdivision 1252(a)(2) of this title, the colored signal lamps shall be either removed, covered, or hooded unless the operator holds a senior operator license.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 265

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

1985, No. 85

, § 8;

1995, No. 88

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 197;

2021, No. 76

, § 35.

§ 1256.
Motorcycles; headgear.

A person may not operate or ride upon a motorcycle upon a highway unless he or she properly wears protective headgear of a type that conforms to the federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards contained in 49 C.F.R. § 571.218, as may be amended. The requirement of this section shall not apply to occupants of fully enclosed autocycles.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 264

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2009, No. 39

, § 3;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 37;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 199.

§ 1257.
Eye protection.

If a motorcycle is not equipped with a windshield or screen, the operator of the motorcycle shall wear either eye glasses, goggles, or a protective face shield when operating the vehicle. The glasses, goggles, or face shield shall have colorless lenses when the motorcycle is being operated during the period of 30 minutes after sunset to 30 minutes before sunrise and at any other time when, due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric conditions, persons and vehicles on the highway are not clearly discernible at a distance of 500 feet ahead.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 264

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2015, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 1258.
Child restraint systems; persons under age 18.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle, other than a type I school bus, in this State upon a public highway unless every occupant under age 18 is properly restrained in a federally approved child passenger restraining system as defined in 49 C.F.R. § 571.213, as may be amended, or a federally approved safety belt, as follows:

all children under the age of one and all children weighing less than 20 pounds, regardless of age, shall be restrained in a rear-facing position, properly secured in a federally approved child passenger restraining system, which shall not be installed in front of an active air bag;

a child weighing more than 20 pounds, and who is one year of age or older and under the age of eight years, shall be restrained in a child passenger restraining system; and

a child eight through 17 years of age shall be restrained in a safety belt system or a child passenger restraining system.

A person shall not be adjudicated in violation of this section if:

the motor vehicle is regularly used to transport passengers for hire, except a motor vehicle owned or operated by a child care facility;

the motor vehicle was manufactured without safety belts; or

the person has been ordered by an enforcement officer, a firefighter, or an authorized civil authority to evacuate persons from a stricken area.

The penalty for violation of this section shall be as follows:

$25.00 for a first violation;

$50.00 for a second violation;

$100.00 for third and subsequent violations.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1987, No. 49

;

1989, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.);

1993, No. 20

, § 1;

1993, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 28

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2004;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 54;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 61;

2009, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. June 1, 2010;

2015, No. 47

, § 28.

§ 1259.
Safety belts; persons 18 years of age or older.

The operator of a motor vehicle shall be guilty of a violation of this section if any person 18 years of age or older is occupying a seating position that has been manufactured with a federally approved safety belt system and is not restrained by the safety belt system while the motor vehicle is in motion on a public highway.

A person is required to be restrained in a safety belt system unless:

the person is a rural mail carrier of the U.S. Postal Service operating a motor vehicle in the performance of employment;

the person is a driver or passenger frequently stopping and leaving the motor vehicle or delivering property from the motor vehicle, if the speed of the motor vehicle between stops does not exceed 15 miles per hour;

the person is the operator of any farm tractor;

the person is a member of the emergency personnel of an emergency motor vehicle and finds it necessary to be unrestrained in order to perform his or her duties;

the motor vehicle the person is occupying is a bus or taxi;

the person is required to be restrained under section 1258 of this title; or

the person has been ordered by an enforcement officer, a firefighter, or an authorized civil authority to evacuate persons from a stricken area.

Noncompliance with the provisions of this section shall not be admissible as evidence in any civil proceeding.

Failure to wear a safety belt in violation of this section shall not constitute negligence or contributory negligence in any civil proceeding or criminal action, nor be entered as evidence to bar prosecution of a criminal offense.

This section may be enforced only if a law enforcement officer has detained the operator of a motor vehicle for another suspected traffic violation. An operator shall not be subject to the penalty established in this section unless the operator is required to pay a penalty for the primary violation.

The penalty for violation of this section shall be as follows:

$25.00 for a first violation;

$50.00 for a second violation;

$100.00 for third and subsequent violations.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 18

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1994; amended

2001, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2003, No. 28

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2004;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 62;

2009, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. June 1, 2010;

2015, No. 47

, § 42;

2021, No. 20

, § 243.